dev/gsoc2011/monodix/noun/noun.bn.dix
    <pardef n="গরু__n_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টাকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টিকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="রানী__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গণ</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="el" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গণকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="el" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গণের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="el" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="সম্রাট__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গণ</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="el" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গণকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="el" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গণের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="el" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="তারকা__n_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গণ</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="el" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গণকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="el" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গণের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="el" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="el" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ক্রেতা"><i>ক্রেতা</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="তারকা"><i>তারকা</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সুলতান"><i>সুলতান</i><par n="সম্রাট__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="রানী"><i>রানী</i><par n="রানী__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ঘোড়া"><i>ঘোড়া</i><par n="গরু__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মাতা"><i>মাতা</i><par n="রানী__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="বিপ্লবী"><i>বিপ্লবী</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="হাতি"><i>হাতি</i><par n="গরু__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="দেশবাসী"><i>দেশবাসী</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পাখি"><i>পাখি</i><par n="গরু__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="গরু"><i>গরু</i><par n="গরু__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="স্রষ্টা"><i>স্রষ্টা</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বিদ্রোহী"><i>বিদ্রোহী</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সহকারী"><i>সহকারী</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রভু"><i>প্রভু</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="তদন্তকারী"><i>তদন্তকারী</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অংশগ্রহণকারী"><i>অংশগ্রহণকারী</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বাচ্চা"><i>বাচ্চা</i><par n="গরু__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সম্রাট"><i>সম্রাট</i><par n="সম্রাট__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="গোয়েন্দা"><i>গোয়েন্দা</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রাণী"><i>প্রাণী</i><par n="গরু__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রতিনিধি"><i>প্রতিনিধি</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রজাপতি"><i>প্রজাপতি</i><par n="গরু__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বিজ্ঞানী"><i>বিজ্ঞানী</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="উদ্যোক্তা"><i>উদ্যোক্তা</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আইনমন্ত্রী"><i>আইনমন্ত্রী</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="চাকরিজীবী"><i>চাকরিজীবী</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ডিসি"><i>ডিসি</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শিক্ষিকা"><i>শিক্ষিকা</i><par n="রানী__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="অ্যাটর্নি"><i>অ্যাটর্নি</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্রিগেডিয়ার"><i>ব্রিগেডিয়ার</i><par n="সম্রাট__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="বুদ্ধিজীবী"><i>বুদ্ধিজীবী</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="উপমন্ত্রী"><i>উপমন্ত্রী</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শিক্ষামন্ত্রী"><i>শিক্ষামন্ত্রী</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রিন্সেস"><i>প্রিন্সেস</i><par n="রানী__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="বিবি"><i>বিবি</i><par n="রানী__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="যোগাযোগমন্ত্রী"><i>যোগাযোগমন্ত্রী</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="দাতা"><i>দাতা</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="নবাব"><i>নবাব</i><par n="সম্রাট__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ভদ্রলোক"><i>ভদ্রলোক</i><par n="সম্রাট__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="পশু"><i>পশু</i><par n="গরু__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পোনা"><i>পোনা</i><par n="গরু__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জমিদার"><i>জমিদার</i><par n="সম্রাট__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="রাণী"><i>রাণী</i><par n="রানী__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="বাহাদুর"><i>বাহাদুর</i><par n="সম্রাট__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="আল্লাহ"><i>আল্লাহ</i><par n="তারকা__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পোপ"><i>পোপ</i><par n="সম্রাট__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="সেইন্ট"><i>সেইন্ট</i><par n="সম্রাট__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="রাজপুত্র"><i>রাজপুত্র</i><par n="সম্রাট__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="তিমি"><i>তিমি</i><par n="গরু__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="রাজকন্যা"><i>রাজকন্যা</i><par n="রানী__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="পান্ডা"><i>পান্ডা</i><par n="গরু__n_mf"/></e>
